src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_32s_sairhaus-dial_Var.gen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sairhaus - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'sykdom' n_32s sairhau - ei tsekattu
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Nom: sairhaus
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Gen: sairhauen
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Par: sairhautta
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Tra: sairhaueksi
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Abe: sairhauetta
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ine: sairhauessa
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ela: sairhauesta
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ill: sairhautheen
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ade: sairhauella
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Abl: sairhauelta
     sairhaus+N+Sg+All: sairhauelle
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ess: sairhautenna
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Nom: sairhauet
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Gen: sairhauksitten
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Par: sairhauksia
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Tra: sairhauksiksi
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Abe: sairhauksitta
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ine: sairhauksissa
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ela: sairhauksista
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ill: sairhaukshiin
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ade: sairhauksilla
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Abl: sairhauksilta
     sairhaus+N+Pl+All: sairhauksille
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ess: sairhauksinna
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Com: sairhauksinne
